Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 431 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Upon approval by the Administration for Children and
Families, a licensed or permitted childcare provider serving a child
eligible for the Department of Human Services' Child Care Subsidy
Program may charge the child's parent or legal guardian the
difference between:
1. The Department's subsidy reimbursement rate applicable to
the child; and

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3552 Page 1

2. The provider's standard private tuition rate for the same
age group and schedule.
B. The Department shall not:
1. Prohibit, restrict, or penalize a provider for charging a
differential authorized pursuant to this act; or
2. Take adverse action against a provider, including, but not
limited to, disqualification, enhanced monitoring, subsidy
enrollment restrictions, or corrective action, solely due to the
provider charging a differential pursuant to this act.
C. Providers who charge a differential shall apply the
differential uniformly to all similarly situated families.
D. The Department shall promulgate rules, update subsidy
agreements, and provide guidance documents to comply with the
provisions of this act.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.






ENGR. H. B. NO. 3552 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 3552 Page 3